Hawaii statutes.
[§323B-3] Privacy of individually
identifiable health information. (a) Notwithstanding any law to
the contrary, any use or disclosure of individually identifiable health
information by any covered entity or business associate that is permitted by 45
Code of Federal Regulations part 164, subpart E, shall be deemed to comply with
all state laws relating to the use, disclosure, or confidentiality of such
information.

(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
an authorization for release of individually identifiable health information
that complies with 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 164.508 shall be
deemed to comply with all state laws relating to individual authorization.

(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
any notice of breach of unsecured protected health information that complies
with 45 Code of Federal Regulations part 164, subpart D, shall be deemed to
comply with all state laws relating to notice of breach of protected health
information. [L 2012, c 315, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next